Utah statutes.
40-2-204.   Coal Miner Certification Panel created -- Duties.

(1)  There is created within the office the "Coal Miner Certification Panel."

(2)  The panel consists of:

(a)  the commissioner or the commissioner's designee; and

(b)  at least eight other members appointed by the commissioner with equal representation and participation from:

(i)  management of coal mine operations; and

(ii)  hourly coal mining employees.

(3)  A member appointed by the commissioner shall:

(a)  have at least five years' experience in coal mining in this state;

(b)  administer the certification test to an applicant referred to in Section 40-2-402;

(c)  consult with the commission about applicant qualifications specified in Section 40-2-402;

(d)  meet when directed by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee; and

(e)  hold office at the pleasure of the commissioner.

(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

